Wisconsin, session 2025, SB695.
do enact as follows:SB695,11Section 1. 20.566 (1) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,2,9220.566 (1) (g) Administration of county sales and use taxes. From moneys 3received from the appropriation under s. 20.835 (4) (g), the amounts in the schedule 4for the purpose of administering the county taxes under subch. V of ch. 77. The 5balance of all taxes collected under subch. V of ch. 77, after the distribution under s. 677.76 (3), shall be credited to this appropriation. Notwithstanding s. 20.001 (3) (a), 7at the end of the fiscal year the unencumbered balance of this appropriation 8account lapses to the general fund shall be transferred to the appropriation account 9under s. 20.835 (4) (g).SB695,210Section 2. 20.566 (1) (gi) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,2,111120.566 (1) (gi) (title) Administration of municipality taxes of 1st class cities.SB695,312Section 3. 20.566 (1) (gj) of the statutes is created to read:SB695,3,31320.566 (1) (gj) Administration of municipality taxes. From the moneys 14transferred from the appropriation account under s. 20.835 (4) (gj), the amounts in 15the schedule for administering the municipality taxes imposed under s. 77.702. 1Notwithstanding s. 20.001 (3) (a), at the end of the fiscal year the unencumbered 2balance of this appropriation account shall be transferred to the appropriation 3account under s. 20.835 (4) (gj).SB695,44Section 4. 20.835 (4) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,3,10520.835 (4) (g) County taxes. All moneys received from the taxes imposed 6under s. 77.70, and from the appropriation account under s. 20.566 (1) (g), for 7distribution to the counties that enact an ordinance imposing taxes under that 8section and for interest payments on refunds under s. 77.76 (3), except that 0.75 9percent of those tax revenues collected under that section shall be credited to the 10appropriation account under s. 20.566 (1) (g).SB695,511Section 5. 20.835 (4) (gi) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,3,121220.835 (4) (gi) (title) Municipality taxes of 1st class cities.SB695,613Section 6. 20.835 (4) (gj) of the statutes is created to read:SB695,3,191420.835 (4) (gj) Municipality taxes. All moneys received from the taxes 15imposed under s. 77.702, and from the appropriation account under s. 20.566 (1) 16(gj), for distribution to the municipalities that enact an ordinance imposing taxes 17under that section and for interest payments on refunds under s. 77.76 (3t), except 18that 0.75 percent of those tax revenues collected under that section shall be credited 19to the appropriation account under s. 20.566 (1) (gj).SB695,720Section 7. 77.70 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,4,132177.70 (1) Except as provided in sub. (2), any county may impose county sales 22and use taxes under this subchapter by the adoption of an ordinance, stating its 23purpose and referring to this subchapter. The rate of the tax imposed under this 1subsection is 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, or 0.5 percent of the sales price or purchase price. 2Except as provided in s. 66.0621 (3m), the county sales and use taxes imposed under 3this subsection may be imposed only for the purpose of directly reducing the 4property tax levy and only in their entirety as provided in this subchapter. That 5ordinance shall be effective on January 1, April 1, July 1, or October 1. A certified 6copy of that ordinance shall be delivered to the secretary of revenue at least 120 7days prior to its effective date. The repeal of any such ordinance shall be effective on 8December 31. A certified copy of a repeal ordinance shall be delivered to the 9secretary of revenue at least 120 days before the effective date of the repeal. Except 10as provided under s. 77.60 (9), the department of revenue may not issue any 11assessment or act on any claim for a refund or any claim for an adjustment under s. 1277.585 after the end of the calendar year that is 4 years after the year in which the 13county has enacted a repeal ordinance under this subsection.SB695,814Section 8. 77.70 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB695,5,61577.70 (3) In addition to the taxes imposed under subs. (1) and (2), a county 16may, by ordinance, impose a sales and use tax under this subchapter at the rate of 170.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, or 0.5 percent of the sales price or purchase price. The revenue 18from the taxes imposed under this subsection may be used for any purpose 19designated by the county board or specified in the ordinance. The taxes imposed 20under this subsection may be imposed only in their entirety as provided in this 21subchapter. An ordinance adopted under this subsection shall be effective on 22January 1, April 1, July 1, or October 1. A certified copy of that ordinance shall be 23delivered to the secretary of revenue at least 120 days prior to its effective date. The 24repeal of any such ordinance shall be effective on December 31. A certified copy of 1a repeal ordinance shall be delivered to the secretary of revenue at least 120 days 2before the effective date of the repeal. Except as provided under s. 77.60 (9), the 3department of revenue may not issue any assessment or act on any claim for a 4refund or any claim for an adjustment under s. 77.585 after the end of the calendar 5year that is 4 years after the year in which the county has enacted a repeal 6ordinance under this subsection.SB695,97Section 9. 77.701 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,5,8877.701 (title) Adoption by municipal ordinance; 1st class cities.SB695,109Section 10. 77.702 of the statutes is created to read:SB695,6,21077.702 Adoption by municipal ordinance; generally. A municipality 11may, by ordinance, impose a sales and use tax under this subchapter at the rate of 120.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, or 0.5 percent of the sales price or purchase price. The revenue 13from the taxes imposed under this section may be used for any purpose designated 14by the governing body of the municipality or specified in the ordinance. The taxes 15imposed under this section may be imposed only in their entirety as provided in this 16subchapter. An ordinance adopted under this section shall be effective on January 171, April 1, July 1, or October 1. A certified copy of that ordinance shall be delivered 18to the secretary of revenue at least 120 days prior to its effective date. The repeal of 19any such ordinance shall be effective on December 31. A certified copy of a repeal 20ordinance shall be delivered to the secretary of revenue at least 120 days before the 21effective date of the repeal. Except as provided under s. 77.60 (9), the department of 22revenue may not issue any assessment nor act on any claim for a refund or any 23claim for an adjustment under s. 77.585 after the end of the calendar year that is 4 1years after the year in which the municipality has enacted a repeal ordinance under 2this section.SB695,113Section 11. 77.71 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,6,7477.71 Imposition of county, municipality, and special district sales 5and use taxes. (intro.) Whenever a sales and use tax ordinance is adopted under 6s. 77.70 or, 77.701, or 77.702 or a special district resolution is adopted under s. 777.706, the following taxes are imposed:SB695,128Section 12. 77.71 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,6,20977.71 (1) For the privilege of selling, licensing, leasing, or renting tangible 10personal property and the items, property, and goods specified under s. 77.52 (1) 11(b), (c), and (d), and for the privilege of selling, licensing, performing, or furnishing 12services a sales tax is imposed upon retailers at the rates under s. 77.70 in the case 13of a county tax, at the rate under s. 77.701 or 77.702 in the case of a municipality 14tax, or at the rate under s. 77.706 in the case of a special district tax of the sales 15price from the sale, license, lease, or rental of tangible personal property and the 16items, property, and goods specified under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), and (d), except 17property taxed under sub. (4), sold, licensed, leased, or rented at retail in the 18county, municipality, or special district, or from selling, licensing, performing, or 19furnishing services described under s. 77.52 (2) in the county, municipality, or 20special district.SB695,1321Section 13. 77.71 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,7,142277.71 (2) An excise tax is imposed at the rates under s. 77.70 in the case of a 23county tax, at the rate under s. 77.701 or 77.702 in the case of a municipality tax, or 1at the rate under s. 77.706 in the case of a special district tax of the purchase price 2upon every person storing, using, or otherwise consuming in the county, 3municipality, or special district tangible personal property, or items, property, or 4goods specified under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or (d), or services if the tangible personal 5property, item, property, good, or service is subject to the state use tax under s. 677.53, except that a receipt indicating that the tax under sub. (1), (3), (4), or (5) has 7been paid relieves the buyer of liability for the tax under this subsection and except 8that if the buyer has paid a similar local tax in another state on a purchase of the 9same tangible personal property, item, property, good, or service that tax shall be 10credited against the tax under this subsection and except that for motor vehicles 11that are used for a purpose in addition to retention, demonstration, or display while 12held for sale in the regular course of business by a dealer the tax under this 13subsection is imposed not on the purchase price but on the amount under s. 77.53 14(1m).SB695,1415Section 14. 77.71 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,8,41677.71 (3) An excise tax is imposed upon a contractor engaged in construction 17activities within the county or special district at the rates under s. 77.70 in the case 18of a county tax, at the rate under s. 77.701 or 77.702 in the case of a municipality 19tax, or at the rate under s. 77.706 in the case of a special district tax of the purchase 20price of tangible personal property or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) 21(b), (c), or (d) that are used in constructing, altering, repairing, or improving real 22property and that became a component part of real property in that county, 23municipality, or special district, except that if the contractor has paid the sales tax 1of a county, municipality, or special district in this state on that tangible personal 2property, item, property, or good, or has paid a similar local sales tax in another 3state on a purchase of the same tangible personal property, item, property, or good, 4that tax shall be credited against the tax under this subsection.SB695,155Section 15. 77.71 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,8,19677.71 (4) An excise tax is imposed at the rates under s. 77.70 in the case of a 7county tax, at the rate under s. 77.701 or 77.702 in the case of a municipality tax, or 8at the rate under s. 77.706 in the case of a special district tax of the purchase price 9upon every person storing, using, or otherwise consuming a motor vehicle, boat, 10recreational vehicle, as defined in s. 340.01 (48r), or aircraft if that property must 11be registered or titled with this state and if that property is to be customarily kept 12in a county that has in effect an ordinance under s. 77.70, in a municipality that has 13in effect an ordinance under s. 77.701 or 77.702, or in a special district that has in 14effect a resolution under s. 77.706, except that if the buyer has paid a similar local 15sales tax in another state on a purchase of the same property, that tax shall be 16credited against the tax under this subsection. The lease or rental of a motor 17vehicle, boat, recreational vehicle, as defined in s. 340.01 (48r), or aircraft is not 18taxed under this subsection if the lease or rental does not require recurring periodic 19payments.SB695,1620Section 16. 77.71 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,9,102177.71 (5) An excise tax is imposed on the purchase price for the lease or rental 22of a motor vehicle, boat, recreational vehicle, as defined in s. 340.01 (48r), or aircraft 23at the rates under s. 77.70 in the case of a county tax, at the rate under s. 77.701 or 177.702 in the case of a municipality tax, or at the rate under s. 77.706 in the case of 2a special district tax upon every person storing, using, or otherwise consuming in 3the county, municipality, or special district the motor vehicle, boat, recreational 4vehicle, as defined in s. 340.01 (48r), or aircraft if that property must be registered 5or titled with this state and if the lease or rental does not require recurring periodic 6payments, except that a receipt indicating that the tax under sub. (1) had been paid 7relieves the purchaser of liability for the tax under this subsection and except that 8if the purchaser has paid a similar local tax in another state on the same lease or 9rental of such motor vehicle, boat, recreational vehicle, as defined in s. 340.01 (48r), 10or aircraft, that tax shall be credited against the tax under this subsection.SB695,1711Section 17. 77.76 (3t) of the statutes is created to read:SB695,9,231277.76 (3t) From the appropriation under s. 20.835 (4) (gj), the department 13shall distribute 99.25 percent of the municipality taxes reported for each enacting 14municipality, minus the municipality portion of the retailers’ discounts, to the 15municipality and shall indicate the taxes reported by each taxpayer, no later than 1675 days following the last day of the calendar quarter in which such amounts were 17reported. In this subsection, the “municipality portion of the retailers’ discount” is 18the amount determined by multiplying the total retailers’ discount by a fraction the 19numerator of which is the gross municipality sales and use taxes payable and the 20denominator of which is the sum of the gross state and municipality sales and use 21taxes payable. The municipality taxes distributed shall be increased or decreased 22to reflect subsequent refunds, audit adjustments, and all other adjustments of the 23municipality taxes previously distributed. Interest paid on refunds of municipality 1sales and use taxes shall be paid from the appropriation under s. 20.835 (4) (gj) at 2the rate paid by this state under s. 77.60 (1) (a). Any municipality receiving a report 3under this subsection is subject to the duties of confidentiality to which the 4department of revenue is subject under s. 77.61 (5) and (6).SB695,185Section 18. 77.76 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:SB695,10,10677.76 (4m) There shall be retained by the state 0.75 percent of the taxes 7collected for taxes imposed by municipalities under s. 77.702 to cover the costs 8incurred by the state in administering, enforcing, and collecting the tax. All 9interest and penalties collected shall be deposited and retained by this state in the 10general fund.SB695,1911Section 19. 79.05 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB695,11,151279.05 (2) (c) Its municipal budget; exclusive of principal and interest on long-13term debt and exclusive of revenue sharing payments under s. 66.0305, payments of 14premiums under s. 66.0137 (5) (c) 1. and 1m., revenues generated from a tax 15imposed under s. 77.701, revenues generated from a tax imposed under s. 77.702, 16payments received under s. 79.038, expenditures of payments due to the 17termination of a tax incremental district under s. 79.096 (3), recycling fee payments 18under s. 289.645, expenditures of grant payments under s. 16.297 (1m), 19unreimbursed expenses related to an emergency declared under s. 323.10, 20expenditures from moneys received pursuant to P.L. 111-5, grants received from the 21state or federal government for the purpose of providing law enforcement, fire 22protection, or emergency medical services, and expenditures made pursuant to a 23purchasing agreement with a school district whereby the municipality makes 24purchases on behalf of the school district; for the year of the statement under s. 179.015 increased over its municipal budget as adjusted under sub. (6); exclusive of 2principal and interest on long-term debt and exclusive of revenue sharing payments 3under s. 66.0305, payments of premiums under s. 66.0137 (5) (c) 1. and 1m., 4revenues generated from a tax imposed under s. 77.701, revenues generated from a 5tax imposed under s. 77.702, payments received under s. 79.038, expenditures of 6payments due to the termination of a tax incremental district under s. 79.096 (3), 7recycling fee payments under s. 289.645, expenditures of grant payments under s. 816.297 (1m), unreimbursed expenses related to an emergency declared under s. 9323.10, expenditures from moneys received pursuant to P.L. 111-5, grants received 10from the state or federal government for the purpose of providing law enforcement, 11fire protection, or emergency medical services, and expenditures made pursuant to 12a purchasing agreement with a school district whereby the municipality makes 13purchases on behalf of the school district; for the year before that year by less than 14the sum of the inflation factor and the valuation factor, rounded to the nearest 0.10 15percent.SB695,2016Section 20. Effective date.SB695,11,1717(1) This act takes effect on July 1, 2026.SB695,11,1818